Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.026, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given them. (b) "Correctional officer" and "officer" mean a person employed by the statedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin or new text end a state correctional facilitydeleted text begin , or a local correctional or detention facilitydeleted text end in a security capacity. (c) "Formal statement" means the questioning of an officer in the course of obtaining a recorded, stenographic, or signed statement to be used as evidence in a disciplinary proceeding against the officer. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.89, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given them. (a) "Administrative hearing" means a nonjudicial hearing or arbitration authorized to recommend, approve, or order discipline. new text begin (b) "Correctional officer" means a person employed by a local correctional or detention facility in a security capacity. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end "Formal statement" means the questioning of an officer in the course of obtaining deleted text begin a recorded, stenographic, or signed statementdeleted text end new text begin informationnew text end to be used as new text begin a basis for disciplining an officer or as new text end evidence in a disciplinary proceeding against the officer. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Officer" means a licensed peace officer or part-time peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraphs (c) and (d), who is employed by a unit of governmentnew text begin , or a correctional officernew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.89, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Applicability. The procedures and provisions of this section apply to law enforcement agencies and government unitsnew text begin , local correctional facilities, and local detention facilitiesnew text end . The procedures and provisions of this section do not apply to investigations of criminal charges against an officer.